Wyoming statutes. Title 35 Public Health and Safety
Article 3. Water Quality
§ 35-11-316.
Unitization of geologic sequestration sites; hearings on application, order; modifications.

Upon receipt of an application under W.S.

35-11-315

, the Wyoming oil and gas conservation commission shall promptly set the matter for hearing, and in addition to any notice otherwise required by law or the commission’s rules, shall cause the applicant to give notice of the hearing, specifying the time and place of hearing, and describing briefly its purpose and the land and pore space affected, to be mailed by certified mail at least thirty (30) days prior to the hearing to all persons whose names and addresses are required to be listed in the application.

After considering the application and hearing the evidence offered in connection therewith, the Wyoming oil and gas conservation commission shall enter an order setting forth the following findings and approving the proposed plan of unitization and proposed operating plan, if any, if the commission finds that:

The material allegations of the application are substantially true;

The purposes specified in W.S.

35-11-314

will be served by granting the application;

The application outlines operations that will comply with environmental requirements;

Granting the application will facilitate the use and production of Wyoming energy resources;

The quantity of pore space storage capacity, and method used to determine the quantity of pore space storage capacity allocated to each separately owned tract within the unit area represents, so far as can be practically determined, each tract’s actual share of the pore space to be used in the sequestration activity;

The method by which the allocation of economic benefits generated from use of pore space within the unit area between pore space owners; and between pore space owners and the unit operator or others is fair and reasonable, taking into consideration the costs required to capture, transport and sequester the carbon dioxide;

The method of generating economic benefits from the use of pore space in the unit area is fair and equitable and is reasonably designed to maximize the value of such use;

Other requirements specified by rules or regulations adopted by the oil and gas conservation commission have been met.

No order of the Wyoming oil and gas conservation commission authorizing the commencement of unit operations shall become effective until the plan of unitization has been signed or in writing ratified or approved by those persons who own at least eighty percent (80%) of the pore space storage capacity within the unit area. If such consent has not been obtained at the time the commissioner’s order is made, the commission shall, upon application, hold supplemental hearings and make findings as may be required to determine when and if the consent will be obtained. The commission shall require the applicant to give notice of a supplemental hearing by regular mail at least thirty (30) days prior to the hearing to each person owning interests in the pore space in the proposed unit area whose name and address was required by W.S. 35-11-315(a) to be listed in the application for the unit operations. If the required percentages of consent have not been obtained within a period of six (6) months from and after the date on which the order of approval is made, the order shall be ineffective and revoked by the commission, unless, for good cause shown, the commission extends that time. Any interested person may file an application with the Wyoming oil and gas conservation commission requesting an order applicable only to the proposed unit area described in the application which shall provide for the percentage of approval or ratification to be reduced from eighty percent (80%) to seventy-five percent (75%). The application shall contain the information required by W.S. 35-11-315(a) and any order of the commission entered pursuant to the application shall comply with subsection (b) of this section. Notice of the hearing on the application shall be given in the same manner and to the same persons as required by subsection (a) of this section. If the commission finds that negotiations were being conducted since July 1, 2009, or have been conducted for a period of at least nine (9) months prior to the filing of the application, that the applicant has participated in the negotiations diligently and in good faith, and that the percentage of approval or ratification required by this subsection cannot be obtained, the commission may reduce any percentage of approval or ratification required by this section from eighty percent (80%) to seventy-five percent (75%). The order shall affect only the unit area described in the application and shall operate only to approve the proposed plan of unitization and proposed operating plan and to reduce the required percentage of approval or ratification thereof and shall not change any other requirement contained in this section.

From and after the effective date of an order of the Wyoming oil and gas conservation commission entered under the provisions of this section, the operation of the unit area defined in the order by persons other than the unit operator or persons acting under the unit operator’s authority, or except in the manner and to the extent provided in the plan of unitization approved by the order, shall be unlawful and is hereby prohibited.

Unless otherwise provided in this section, an order entered by the Wyoming oil and gas conservation commission under this section may be amended in the same manner and subject to the same conditions as an original order or previous agreement: provided, no amendatory order shall change the assignments of pore space storage capacity between existing pore space owners in the unit area as established by the original order or previous agreement, except with the written consent of those persons who own at least eighty percent (80%) of the pore space storage capacity in the unit area, nor change any allocation of costs as established by the original order or previous agreement, except with the written consent of those persons who own at least eighty percent (80%) of the unit pore space storage capacity. If consent has not been obtained at the time the commission order is made, the commission shall, upon application, hold supplemental hearings and make findings as may be required to determine when and if such consent will be obtained. The commission shall require the applicant to give notice of a supplemental hearing by regular mail at least thirty (30) days prior to the hearing to each person owning interests in the unit area whose name and address was required by the provisions of W.S. 35-11-315(a)(iii) to be listed in the application for the unit operations. If the required percentages of consent have not been obtained within a period of six (6) months from and after the date on which the order of approval is made, the order shall be ineffective and revoked by the commission, unless, for good cause shown, the commission extends that time. Any interested person may file an application with the Wyoming oil and gas conservation commission requesting an order applicable only to the unit area described in the application which shall provide for the percentage of approval or ratification to be reduced from eighty percent (80%) to seventy-five percent (75%). The application shall contain the information required by W.S. 35-11-315(a) and any order of the commission entered pursuant to the application shall comply with subsection (b) of this section. Notice of the hearing on the application shall be given in the same manner and to the same persons as required by subsection (a) of this section. If the commission finds that negotiations were being conducted since July 1, 2009 or have been conducted for a period of at least nine (9) months prior to the filing of the application, that the applicant has participated in the negotiations diligently and in good faith, and that the percentage of approval or ratification required by this subsection cannot be obtained, the commission may reduce any percentage of approval or ratification required by this section from eighty percent (80%) to seventy-five percent (75%). The order shall affect only the unit area described in the application and operate only to reduce the required percentage of approval or ratification necessary for amending the assignment of pore space and shall not change any other requirement contained in this section.

The Wyoming oil and gas conservation commission, upon its own motion or upon application, and with notice and hearing, may modify its order regarding the operation, size or other characteristic of the unit area in order to prevent or assist in preventing a substantial inequity resulting from operation of the unit, provided that no such modification may amend any permit issued under W.S.

35-11-313

.

Any owner of pore space within a geologic sequestration site who has not been included within a unitization application or order authorizing a unit under this section, may petition for inclusion in the unit area. The petition shall be filed with the Wyoming oil and gas conservation commission and shall describe the petitioner’s legal entitlement to the pore space, the location of the pore space, whether the pore space is included within any permitting area applicable to the unit area and the bases for inclusion in the unit area. The petition shall be accompanied by a deposit of money sufficient to pay all costs of the inclusion proceedings. The commission shall require the petitioner to publish a notice of filing of the petition which notice shall state the filing of the petition, the name of the petitioner, the location of the pore space and the prayer of the petitioner. The notice shall notify all interested persons to appear at a specified time and place and to show cause, in writing, if any they have, why the petition should not be granted. The commission at the time and place mentioned in the notice shall proceed to hear the petition and all objections thereto and shall thereafter grant or deny the petition. The filing of the petition shall be deemed and taken as an assent by each and all petitioners to the inclusion in the unit of the pore space mentioned in the petition or any part thereof. If the petition is granted, the petitioner shall be considered to have been a member of the unit since its inception and, upon the payment of any costs paid by unit members, shall be entitled to all economic benefits received by unit members since the inception of the unit provided that no unit modification affects any permit issued under W.S.

35-11-313

. The oil and gas conservation commission shall adopt rules providing for the fair and equitable determination of pore space storage capacity for each successful petitioner and the means by which successful petitioners shall be paid the economic benefits to which they are entitled under this subsection, including, if necessary, a reallocation of economic benefits among unit members.

A certified copy of any order of the Wyoming oil and gas conservation commission entered under the provisions of this section shall be entitled to be recorded in the land records of the county clerk for the counties where all or any portion of the unit area is located, and the recordation shall constitute notice thereof to all persons.

No provision of W.S.

35-11-314

through

35-11-317

shall be construed to confer on any person the right of eminent domain and no order for unitization issued under this section shall act so as to grant to any person the right of eminent domain.

No order for unitization issued under this section shall act so as to grant any person a right of use or access to a surface estate if that person would not otherwise have such a right.

History.

Laws 2009, ch. 76, § 1.

The 2022 amendment,

effective July 1, 2023, substituted “35-11-319” for “35-11-317” in (j).

§ 35-11-316.
Unitization of geologic sequestration sites; hearings on application, order; modifications. [Effective July 1, 2023]

Upon receipt of an application under W.S.

35-11-315

, the Wyoming oil and gas conservation commission shall promptly set the matter for hearing, and in addition to any notice otherwise required by law or the commission’s rules, shall cause the applicant to give notice of the hearing, specifying the time and place of hearing, and describing briefly its purpose and the land and pore space affected, to be mailed by certified mail at least thirty (30) days prior to the hearing to all persons whose names and addresses are required to be listed in the application.

After considering the application and hearing the evidence offered in connection therewith, the Wyoming oil and gas conservation commission shall enter an order setting forth the following findings and approving the proposed plan of unitization and proposed operating plan, if any, if the commission finds that:

The material allegations of the application are substantially true;

The purposes specified in W.S.

35-11-314

will be served by granting the application;

The application outlines operations that will comply with environmental requirements;

Granting the application will facilitate the use and production of Wyoming energy resources;

The quantity of pore space storage capacity, and method used to determine the quantity of pore space storage capacity allocated to each separately owned tract within the unit area represents, so far as can be practically determined, each tract’s actual share of the pore space to be used in the sequestration activity;

The method by which the allocation of economic benefits generated from use of pore space within the unit area between pore space owners; and between pore space owners and the unit operator or others is fair and reasonable, taking into consideration the costs required to capture, transport and sequester the carbon dioxide;

The method of generating economic benefits from the use of pore space in the unit area is fair and equitable and is reasonably designed to maximize the value of such use;

Other requirements specified by rules or regulations adopted by the oil and gas conservation commission have been met.

No order of the Wyoming oil and gas conservation commission authorizing the commencement of unit operations shall become effective until the plan of unitization has been signed or in writing ratified or approved by those persons who own at least eighty percent (80%) of the pore space storage capacity within the unit area. If such consent has not been obtained at the time the commissioner’s order is made, the commission shall, upon application, hold supplemental hearings and make findings as may be required to determine when and if the consent will be obtained. The commission shall require the applicant to give notice of a supplemental hearing by regular mail at least thirty (30) days prior to the hearing to each person owning interests in the pore space in the proposed unit area whose name and address was required by W.S. 35-11-315(a) to be listed in the application for the unit operations. If the required percentages of consent have not been obtained within a period of six (6) months from and after the date on which the order of approval is made, the order shall be ineffective and revoked by the commission, unless, for good cause shown, the commission extends that time. Any interested person may file an application with the Wyoming oil and gas conservation commission requesting an order applicable only to the proposed unit area described in the application which shall provide for the percentage of approval or ratification to be reduced from eighty percent (80%) to seventy-five percent (75%). The application shall contain the information required by W.S. 35-11-315(a) and any order of the commission entered pursuant to the application shall comply with subsection (b) of this section. Notice of the hearing on the application shall be given in the same manner and to the same persons as required by subsection (a) of this section. If the commission finds that negotiations were being conducted since July 1, 2009, or have been conducted for a period of at least nine (9) months prior to the filing of the application, that the applicant has participated in the negotiations diligently and in good faith, and that the percentage of approval or ratification required by this subsection cannot be obtained, the commission may reduce any percentage of approval or ratification required by this section from eighty percent (80%) to seventy-five percent (75%). The order shall affect only the unit area described in the application and shall operate only to approve the proposed plan of unitization and proposed operating plan and to reduce the required percentage of approval or ratification thereof and shall not change any other requirement contained in this section.

From and after the effective date of an order of the Wyoming oil and gas conservation commission entered under the provisions of this section, the operation of the unit area defined in the order by persons other than the unit operator or persons acting under the unit operator’s authority, or except in the manner and to the extent provided in the plan of unitization approved by the order, shall be unlawful and is hereby prohibited.

Unless otherwise provided in this section, an order entered by the Wyoming oil and gas conservation commission under this section may be amended in the same manner and subject to the same conditions as an original order or previous agreement: provided, no amendatory order shall change the assignments of pore space storage capacity between existing pore space owners in the unit area as established by the original order or previous agreement, except with the written consent of those persons who own at least eighty percent (80%) of the pore space storage capacity in the unit area, nor change any allocation of costs as established by the original order or previous agreement, except with the written consent of those persons who own at least eighty percent (80%) of the unit pore space storage capacity. If consent has not been obtained at the time the commission order is made, the commission shall, upon application, hold supplemental hearings and make findings as may be required to determine when and if such consent will be obtained. The commission shall require the applicant to give notice of a supplemental hearing by regular mail at least thirty (30) days prior to the hearing to each person owning interests in the unit area whose name and address was required by the provisions of W.S. 35-11-315(a)(iii) to be listed in the application for the unit operations. If the required percentages of consent have not been obtained within a period of six (6) months from and after the date on which the order of approval is made, the order shall be ineffective and revoked by the commission, unless, for good cause shown, the commission extends that time. Any interested person may file an application with the Wyoming oil and gas conservation commission requesting an order applicable only to the unit area described in the application which shall provide for the percentage of approval or ratification to be reduced from eighty percent (80%) to seventy-five percent (75%). The application shall contain the information required by W.S. 35-11-315(a) and any order of the commission entered pursuant to the application shall comply with subsection (b) of this section. Notice of the hearing on the application shall be given in the same manner and to the same persons as required by subsection (a) of this section. If the commission finds that negotiations were being conducted since July 1, 2009 or have been conducted for a period of at least nine (9) months prior to the filing of the application, that the applicant has participated in the negotiations diligently and in good faith, and that the percentage of approval or ratification required by this subsection cannot be obtained, the commission may reduce any percentage of approval or ratification required by this section from eighty percent (80%) to seventy-five percent (75%). The order shall affect only the unit area described in the application and operate only to reduce the required percentage of approval or ratification necessary for amending the assignment of pore space and shall not change any other requirement contained in this section.

The Wyoming oil and gas conservation commission, upon its own motion or upon application, and with notice and hearing, may modify its order regarding the operation, size or other characteristic of the unit area in order to prevent or assist in preventing a substantial inequity resulting from operation of the unit, provided that no such modification may amend any permit issued under W.S.

35-11-313

.

Any owner of pore space within a geologic sequestration site who has not been included within a unitization application or order authorizing a unit under this section, may petition for inclusion in the unit area. The petition shall be filed with the Wyoming oil and gas conservation commission and shall describe the petitioner’s legal entitlement to the pore space, the location of the pore space, whether the pore space is included within any permitting area applicable to the unit area and the bases for inclusion in the unit area. The petition shall be accompanied by a deposit of money sufficient to pay all costs of the inclusion proceedings. The commission shall require the petitioner to publish a notice of filing of the petition which notice shall state the filing of the petition, the name of the petitioner, the location of the pore space and the prayer of the petitioner. The notice shall notify all interested persons to appear at a specified time and place and to show cause, in writing, if any they have, why the petition should not be granted. The commission at the time and place mentioned in the notice shall proceed to hear the petition and all objections thereto and shall thereafter grant or deny the petition. The filing of the petition shall be deemed and taken as an assent by each and all petitioners to the inclusion in the unit of the pore space mentioned in the petition or any part thereof. If the petition is granted, the petitioner shall be considered to have been a member of the unit since its inception and, upon the payment of any costs paid by unit members, shall be entitled to all economic benefits received by unit members since the inception of the unit provided that no unit modification affects any permit issued under W.S.

35-11-313

. The oil and gas conservation commission shall adopt rules providing for the fair and equitable determination of pore space storage capacity for each successful petitioner and the means by which successful petitioners shall be paid the economic benefits to which they are entitled under this subsection, including, if necessary, a reallocation of economic benefits among unit members.

A certified copy of any order of the Wyoming oil and gas conservation commission entered under the provisions of this section shall be entitled to be recorded in the land records of the county clerk for the counties where all or any portion of the unit area is located, and the recordation shall constitute notice thereof to all persons.

No provision of W.S.

35-11-314

through

35-11-319

shall be construed to confer on any person the right of eminent domain and no order for unitization issued under this section shall act so as to grant to any person the right of eminent domain.

No order for unitization issued under this section shall act so as to grant any person a right of use or access to a surface estate if that person would not otherwise have such a right.

History.

Laws 2009, ch. 76, § 1; 2022 ch. 101, § 2, effective July 1, 2023.

§ 35-11-317.
Unitization of geologic sequestration sites; economic benefits; liens.

No order of the Wyoming oil and gas conservation commission or other contract relating to a separately owned tract within the unit area shall be terminated by the order providing for unit operations, but shall remain in force and apply to that tract, its benefits, burdens and obligations, until terminated in accordance with the provisions thereof.

Except to the extent that the parties affected agree, no order providing for unit operations shall be construed to result in a transfer of all or any part of the title to pore space or other rights in any tract in the unit area and no agreement or order shall operate to violate the terms and requirements of any permit applicable to pore space within the unit area.

History.

Laws 2009, ch. 76, § 1.

Editor’s notes. —

Laws 2022, ch. 101, § 4, provides, “The provisions of this act shall apply to all holders of permits for geologic sequestration of carbon dioxide issued under W.S.

35-11-313

and to all orders of unitization of geologic sequestration sites under W.S.

35-11-314

through

35-11-317

before, on and after the effective date of this section.”

§ 35-11-318.
Geologic sequestration special revenue account. [Effective until July 1, 2023]

There is created the Wyoming geologic sequestration special revenue account. The account shall be administered by the director and all funds in the account shall be transmitted to the state treasurer for credit to the account and shall be invested by the state treasurer as authorized under W.S. 9-4-715(a), (d) and (e) in a manner to obtain the highest return possible consistent with the preservation of the corpus. Any interest earned on the investment or deposit of monies into the fund shall remain in the fund and shall not be credited to the general fund. All funds in the account are continuously appropriated for use by the director consistent with this section.

The account shall consist of all monies collected by the department to measure, monitor and verify Wyoming geologic sequestration sites following site closure certification, release of all financial assurance instruments and termination of the permit. The department shall promulgate rules necessary to collect monies in an amount reasonably calculated to pay the costs of measuring, monitoring and verifying the sites.

Funds in the account shall be used only for the measurement, monitoring and verification of geologic sequestration sites following site closure certification, release of all financial assurance instruments and termination of the permit.

The existence, management and expenditure of funds from this account shall not constitute a waiver by the state of Wyoming of its immunity from suit, nor does it constitute an assumption of any liability by the state for geologic sequestration sites or the carbon dioxide and associated constituents injected into those sites.

History.

Laws 2010, ch. 52, § 1.

Appropriations. —

Laws 2010, ch. 52, § 4, provides:

“(a) For the period beginning July 1, 2010 and ending June 30, 2012:

“(i) There is appropriated two hundred thousand dollars ($200,000.00) from the general fund to the Wyoming department of environmental quality to pay the salary and benefits for the position authorized to be reclassified and filled under paragraph (ii) of this subsection;

“(ii) The Wyoming department of environmental quality is authorized to reclassify one (1) computer technology support specialist full-time equivalent position which is vacant as of the effective date of this act to a principal accountant full-time equivalent position to assist the department in fulfilling its rulemaking duties relating to financial assurances pursuant to this act.

“(b) The funding for the position authorized under subsection (a) of this section shall be included in the exception budget request of the department of environmental quality for the biennium beginning July 1, 2012.

“(c) The authorization under paragraph (a)(ii) of this section to reclassify and fill the vacant position shall not be considered to be the filling of a vacant position for purposes of section 314 of 2010 House Bill 0001. The appropriation in paragraph (a)(i) of this section shall be reduced dollar for dollar by any funds appropriated in 2010 House Bill 0001 to the department for the vacant position reclassified pursuant to this section.”

Effective dates. —

Laws 2010, ch. 52, § 5, provides: “(a) Except as provided in subsection (b) of this section, this act is effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by Article 4, Section 8 of the Wyoming Constitution.” Approved March 5, 2010.

“(b) Section 4 of this act is effective July 1, 2010.”

§ 35-11-318.
Geologic sequestration special revenue account. [Renumbered to Wyo. Stat. § 35-11-320, effective July 1, 2023]

History.

Laws 2010, ch. 52, § 1; renumbered to Wyo. Stat. §

35-11-320

by 2022 ch. 101, § 3, effective July 1, 2023.

§ 35-11-318.
Title to sequestered and injected carbon dioxide; definitions. [Effective July 1, 2023]

As used in this section and in W.S.

35-11-319

, “injector” means a person applying for or holding a permit or certificate for geologic sequestration of carbon dioxide under W.S.

35-11-313

.

An injector shall:

Have title to any carbon dioxide the injector injects into and stores underground or within a unit area;

Hold title for any injected or stored carbon dioxide until the department issues a certificate of project completion as specified in W.S.

35-11-319

.

During any time the injector holds title to carbon dioxide under this section, the injector shall be liable for any damage the injected or stored carbon dioxide may cause, including damage caused by carbon dioxide that escapes or is released from where it is being stored underground.

History.

2022 ch. 101, § 1, effective July 1, 2023.

Effective date. —

Laws 2022, ch, 101, § 6, makes the act effective July 1, 2023.

§ 35-11-319.
Certificate of project completion; release; transfer of title and custody. [Effective July 1, 2023]

After all carbon dioxide injections underground or into pore space are completed as provided by a permit issued under W.S.

35-11-313

and upon application by the injector holding title to the carbon dioxide under W.S.

35-11-318

, the department may issue a certificate of project completion. The department shall only issue a certificate upon satisfaction of the conditions imposed under subsections (b), (c) and (d) of this section and after providing public notice of the application, an opportunity for public comment and a public hearing on the application.

A certificate of project completion shall not be issued until at least twenty (20) years after carbon dioxide injections end.

A certificate of project completion shall not be issued until the injector with title to the carbon dioxide establishes to the satisfaction of the department that:

The injector is in full compliance with all laws governing the injection and storage of the carbon dioxide;

The injector has addressed any pending claims regarding the injection and storage of the carbon dioxide;

The underground place or pore space where the carbon dioxide was injected or stored is expected to no longer expand vertically or horizontally and poses no threat to human health, human safety, the environment or underground sources of drinking water;

The stored or injected carbon dioxide is unlikely to cross any underground or pore space boundary and is not expected to endanger any underground source of drinking water or otherwise endanger human health, human safety or the environment;

All wells, equipment and facilities to be used in maintaining and managing the stored carbon dioxide are in good condition and will retain mechanical integrity;

The injector has plugged any injection wells and has completed all reclamation required by the department.

Upon the issuance of a certificate of project completion under subsection (a) of this section:

In exchange for assuming responsibility and liability for the stored carbon dioxide as provided in this section, title to the stored or injected carbon dioxide, and any facilities used to inject or store the carbon dioxide, without payment of any compensation, shall be transferred to the state;

Title acquired by the state includes all rights, and interests in, and all responsibilities associated with, the stored or injected carbon dioxide;

Primary responsibility and liability for the stored or injected carbon dioxide shall be transferred to the state, provided that liability to the state shall not result in the payment of any damages in excess of the balance of the Wyoming geologic sequestration special revenue account created by W.S. 35-11-320(a);

The injector and all persons who generated any injected or stored carbon dioxide shall be forever released from all regulatory requirements associated with the continued storage and maintenance of the injected carbon dioxide;

Any bond or financial assurance submitted to the department under W.S.

35-11-313

through

35-11-317

shall be released;

The state, through the department, shall assume responsibility to manage and monitor the stored carbon dioxide until such time when the federal government assumes responsibility for the long-term monitoring and management of stored carbon dioxide.

History.

2022 ch. 101, § 1, effective July 1, 2023.

Effective date. —

Laws 2022, ch, 101, § 6, makes the act effective July 1, 2023.

§ 35-11-320.
Geologic sequestration special revenue account. [Renumbered from Wyo. Stat. § 35-11-318, effective July 1, 2023]

There is created the Wyoming geologic sequestration special revenue account. The account shall be administered by the director and all funds in the account shall be transmitted to the state treasurer for credit to the account and shall be invested by the state treasurer as authorized under W.S. 9-4-715(a), (d) and (e) in a manner to obtain the highest return possible consistent with the preservation of the corpus. Any interest earned on the investment or deposit of monies into the fund shall remain in the fund and shall not be credited to the general fund. All funds in the account are continuously appropriated for use by the director consistent with this section.

The account shall consist of all monies collected by the department to measure, monitor and verify Wyoming geologic sequestration sites following project completion certification, release of all financial assurance instruments and termination of the permit. The department shall promulgate rules necessary to collect monies in an amount reasonably calculated to pay the costs of measuring, monitoring and verifying the sites.

Funds in the account shall be used only for:

The testing, monitoring and long-term inspections of geologic sequestration sites;

Remediation of mechanical problems associated with remaining wells and infrastructure;

Plugging and abandoning monitoring wells;

All future claims associated with the release of carbon dioxide from the geologic sequestration sites following project completion certification, release of all financial assurance instruments and termination of the permit.

The existence, management and expenditure of funds from this account shall not constitute a waiver by the state of Wyoming of its immunity from suit, nor does it constitute an assumption of any liability by the state for geologic sequestration sites.

History.

Laws 2010, ch. 52, § 1; renumbered from Wyo. Stat. §

35-11-318

by 2022 ch. 101, § 3, effective July 1, 2023.

The 2022 amendment,

effective July 1, 2023, substituted “project completion” for “site closure” in the first sentence of (b); added (c)(i) designation; in (c)(i), substituted “testing” for “measurement,” “long-term inspections” for “verification”; added (c)(ii) and (c)(iii); added (c)(iv) designation; in (c)(iv), added “All future claims associated with the release of carbon dioxide from the geologic sequestration sites,” substituted “project completion” for “site closure”; and deleted “or the carbon dioxide and associated constituents injected into those sites” at the end of (d).

Appropriations. —

Laws 2010, ch. 52, § 4, provides:

“(a) For the period beginning July 1, 2010 and ending June 30, 2012:

“(i) There is appropriated two hundred thousand dollars ($200,000.00) from the general fund to the Wyoming department of environmental quality to pay the salary and benefits for the position authorized to be reclassified and filled under paragraph (ii) of this subsection;

“(ii) The Wyoming department of environmental quality is authorized to reclassify one (1) computer technology support specialist full-time equivalent position which is vacant as of the effective date of this act to a principal accountant full-time equivalent position to assist the department in fulfilling its rulemaking duties relating to financial assurances pursuant to this act.

“(b) The funding for the position authorized under subsection (a) of this section shall be included in the exception budget request of the department of environmental quality for the biennium beginning July 1, 2012.

“(c) The authorization under paragraph (a)(ii) of this section to reclassify and fill the vacant position shall not be considered to be the filling of a vacant position for purposes of section 314 of 2010 House Bill 0001. The appropriation in paragraph (a)(i) of this section shall be reduced dollar for dollar by any funds appropriated in 2010 House Bill 0001 to the department for the vacant position reclassified pursuant to this section.”

Effective dates. —

Laws 2010, ch. 52, § 5, provides: “(a) Except as provided in subsection (b) of this section, this act is effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by Article 4, Section 8 of the Wyoming Constitution.” Approved March 5, 2010.

“(b) Section 4 of this act is effective July 1, 2010.”